South Dakota, session 2026, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 2-4-2 be AMENDED:
2-4-2. The salary of each member of the Legislature is equal to one-fifth twenty-
two percent of the South Dakota median household income for the most recent year for
which data is available, as reported by the United States Census Current Population
American Community Survey, as conducted by the United States Census Bureau, and
ascertained and adjusted each year by the State Board of Finance to take effect on the
first day of January of each year for every regular legislative session. In addition, each
legislator member shall receive:
(1) Reimbursement to be paid after the regular legislative session for actual mileage
or its the equivalent traveled to and from home, not more than once each weekend
or between days of recess during the regular legislative session, at the rate set
pursuant to § 3-9-1;
(2) Expenses of one hundred twenty-three dollars per day for each day of a regular or
special legislative session as prepaid reimbursement for living expenses, including
meals and lodging, laundry, cleaning and pressing of clothing, and all other
uncompensated expenses, as defined in § 2-4-2.1, incident to the performance of
legislative services, or at the amount fixed for the per diem allowance that is
authorized by the United States Internal Revenue Service to be excluded from the
gross income without itemization as of October first each year, whichever of the
two is greater; and
(3) Five cents once each regular or special legislative session for every mile of
necessary travel in going to and returning from the place of meeting of the
Legislature by the most usual route.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.738.29 2 1177
For each day's attendance at special sessions, each member, in addition to mileage
and expenses, shall receive a per diem calculated by the director of the Legislative
Research Council equal to the normal daily compensation for the regular session
immediately preceding the special session.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.